Rhode Island statutes. Title 43 Statutes and Statutory Construction
Chapter 4 Effect of General Laws

43-4-1 — 43-4-1.14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 142, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1969, ch. 43, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1970, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 209, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1977, ch. 142, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 366, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 319, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 198, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 78, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 3, effective July 5, 1995.

43-4-2.
Continuity of laws included.

So much of the statutes contained in this revision of 1956 as remain in substance the same as before the revision shall be deemed and taken to have continued in force from the time of their first enactment and as if this revision had not been made.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 297, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 366, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 419, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 657, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

43-4-2

.

43-4-3.
Citation of general laws.

The statutes consolidated and arranged in this revision of 1956 may be designated in all citations thereof as the general laws, adding to the citation whenever necessary the number of the title, the chapter, and of the section; but such statutes shall be deemed as statutes of the year in which they were, respectively, originally enacted.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 297, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 366, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 419, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 657, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

43-4-3

.

43-4-4 — 43-4-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 142, §§ 4-6; P.L. 1969, ch. 43, §§ 4-6; P.L. 1976, ch. 209, §§ 4-6; P.L. 1977, ch. 142, §§ 4-6; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, §§ 4-6; P.L. 1980, ch. 366, §§ 4-6; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, §§ 4-6; P.L. 1982, ch. 319, §§ 4-6; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 198, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 78, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 3, effective July 5, 1995.

43-4-7.
Existing rights and remedies unaffected by repeal.

The repeal of the acts referred to or enumerated in this chapter, shall not affect any acts done or any right accruing or accrued, acquired, or established, or any remedy for any injury thereto, or any suit or proceeding had or commenced in any civil case before the time when the repeal shall take effect, but the proceedings in every case shall be conformed, whenever necessary, to the provisions of the general laws.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 298, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 367, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 420, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 658, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

43-4-7

.

43-4-8.
Effect of repeal on previous offenses.

No offense committed and no penalty or forfeiture incurred under any of the acts repealed by this chapter and before the time when the repeal shall take effect shall be affected by the repeal, except that whenever any punishment, penalty, or forfeiture shall be mitigated by the provisions of the general laws, the provisions may be extended and applied to any judgment to be pronounced after the repeal.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 298, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 367, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 420, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 658, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

43-4-8

.

43-4-9.
Effect of repeal on pending proceedings.

No suit or prosecution pending at the time of the repeal, for any offense committed or for the recovery of any penalty or forfeiture incurred, under any of the acts repealed by this chapter, shall be affected by the repeal, except that the proceedings in the suit or prosecution shall be conformed whenever necessary to the provisions of the general laws.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 298, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 367, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 420, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 658, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

43-4-9

.

43-4-10.
Terms of office continued.

All persons who, at the time when the repeal shall take effect, shall hold any office under the acts repealed by this chapter shall continue to hold the office under the tenure of the office, except those offices which are abolished and those as to which a different provision is made by the general laws.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 298, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 367, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 420, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 658, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

43-4-10

.

43-4-11.
Previously repealed acts not revived.

No act, which has been previously repealed, shall be revived by the repeal contained in this chapter of any of the acts repealed by this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 298, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 367, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 420, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 658, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

43-4-11

.

43-4-12.
Repeal of previously repealed acts not construction of continued effectiveness.

The repeal in this chapter of any statute or part of a statute previously repealed shall not be construed as a declaration or implication that the statute or part of a statute has been in force at any time subsequent to the first repeal.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 298, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 367, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 420, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 658, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

43-4-12

.

43-4-13.
References in other statutes to laws repealed by this chapter.

Wherever any statute not repealed in the general laws refers to and adopts any statute or part of a statute which is repealed in the general laws or any provision or rule of law which is abrogated or modified by the general laws, the statute, part of a statute, provision, or rule of law so referred to and adopted shall not be deemed repealed by the provisions of this chapter but shall be in force only so far as the same shall have been so adopted, and for no other purpose, and so far only as is not repugnant to or inconsistent with the provisions of the general laws.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 298, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 367, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 420, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 658, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

43-4-13

.

43-4-14.
Continuity of limitations and periods of time.

Whenever a limitation or period of time prescribed in any of the acts repealed by this chapter for the acquiring of any right or the barring of any remedy or for any other purpose shall have begun to run and the same or any similar limitation is prescribed in the general laws, the time of limitation shall continue to run and shall have the like effect as if the whole period had begun and ended under the operation of the general laws.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 298, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 367, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 420, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 658, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

43-4-14

.

43-4-15 — 43-4-17.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 142, § 7; P.L. 1969, ch. 43, § 7; P.L. 1970, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 209, § 7; P.L. 1977, ch. 142, § 7; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 7; P.L. 1980, ch. 366, § 7; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 7; P.L. 1982, ch. 319, § 7; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 3; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 198, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 78, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 492, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 354, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 324, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 422, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 14, § 2, ch. 134, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 3, effective July 5, 1995.

43-4-18.
Enactment of supplemental reenactments by the law revision director.

The office of law revision of the joint committee on legislative services is authorized to annually reenact specific titles of the general laws which shall be amendatory to the general laws of Rhode Island, 1956, as amended, for the purposes specified in §

22-11-3.4

. Substantive changes contained in the reenactment of these titles shall be annually brought to the attention of the general assembly in a “Statutes and Statutory Construction” bill, prepared by the law revision office, for general assembly approval or disapproval.

The reenacted sections of the general laws shall be construed as continuations of previously enacted public laws and all rights and remedies remain in effect as defined in this chapter.

In case of any conflict between an act passed at an annual or special session of the general assembly and an amendment adopted as a part of a reenactment or the “Statutes and Statutory Construction” bill referred to in subsection (a) of this section, the former shall be controlling regardless of respective dates of passage or approval.

The provisions in titles that have been amended and corrected as “reenactments” shall take effect and go into operation on and after December 31 of the calendar year of their reenactment.

The enactment of this section and the repeal of sections in chapter 4 of title 43 adopted prior to the date of enactment of this chapter of the public laws shall not act as a repeal of those chapters of the public laws which have been adopted to reenact the general laws.

Any subsequent reenactments shall be recorded in the history of this section.

In any reenactment, the word “text” as used in the general laws does not include: (1) printer’s reference lines appearing at the top or bottom of any galley proof; (2) title or chapter heading (except the numbers of said titles and chapters); (3) tables of contents appearing at the beginning of the titles and chapters; or (4) boldface captions appearing at the beginning of sections (except the numbers of said sections), except insofar as the title or chapter headings or boldface captions are necessary for clarification of any statutory text.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 4; P.L. 1998, ch. 441, § 34.

43-4-18.1.
Use of appropriate disability language.

The office of the law revision director is authorized and empowered to delete the words “the handicapped” and insert instead the words “people with disabilities”, delete the words “handicap person” or “handicapped person” and insert instead the words “person with disability”, and delete the word “handicap” and insert instead the word “disability” in any reenactment of the general laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 287, § 3.